California, session 20252026, SB1109.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1520.15 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1520.15. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2027, all licenses issued for the operation of a short-term residential therapeutic program shall be subject to renewal annually by the department if either of the following are met: the licensee has been issued a total of five or more type “A” citations within the past 12 months.(1)The licensee has been issued a total of 5 or more type “A” or type “B” citations within the past 12 months.(2)The county in which the short-term residential therapeutic program operates has a population of less than 75,000 residents and there is no high school or general acute care hospital operating in the county.(b) A licensee subject to annual review pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not be subject to ongoing annual renewal pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) if the licensee has receives less than 5 five violations in the 12 months following an annual license review.